Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1070
Injunctions; when binding.

An injunction binds the party from the time he has notice thereof and the undertaking required of the applicant therefor is executed.

R.S.1867, Code § 258, p. 436;

R.S.1913, § 7799;

C.S.1922, § 8743;

C.S.1929, § 20-1070;

R.S.1943, § 25-1070.